Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.440

Collection agency—Prohibited acts—Unfair and deceptive trade practices under chapter 19.86 RCW.

The operation of a collection agency or out-of-state collection agency without a license as prohibited by RCW 19.16.110 and the commission by a licensee or an employee of a licensee of an act or practice prohibited by RCW 19.16.250 or 19.16.260 are declared to be unfair acts or practices or unfair methods of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce for the purpose of the application of the consumer protection act found in chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2020 c 30 s 3; 1994 c 195 s 11; 1973 1st ex.s. c 20 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 35.]

NOTES:

Application—2020 c 30: See note following RCW 19.16.100.